Florida, session 2026, SB1232.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âPresent subsections (4) through (7) of section 18 117.021, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 19 through (8), respectively, and a new subsection (4) is added to 20 that section, to read: 21 117.021âElectronic notarization.â 22 (4)âWhen performing a notarial act under s. 695.03, in 23 addition to all other requirements of this section, a notary 24 public shall use an electronic signature that is accompanied by 25 a date, a time stamp, and the names of the grantor and grantee. 26 The date, time stamp, and names of the grantor and grantee must 27 appear as a watermark through the signature to prevent copying 28 the signature to another document. 29 Section 2.âPresent subsections (3) and (4) of section 30 695.26, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) 31 and (5), respectively, a new subsection (3) is added to that 32 section, and subsection (1) of that section is amended, to read: 33 695.26âRequirements for recording instruments affecting 34 real property.â 35 (1)âNo instrument by which the title to real property or 36 any interest therein is conveyed, assigned, encumbered, or 37 otherwise disposed of shall be recorded by the clerk of the 38 circuit court unless: 39 (a)âThe name of each person who executed such instrument is 40 legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument 41 immediately beneath the signature of such person and the post 42 office address of each such person is legibly printed, 43 typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument; 44 (b)âA clear and legible copy of a valid and unredacted 45 identification document in the name of each person who executed 46 such instrument is presented to the clerk; 47 (c)(b)âThe name and post-office address of the natural 48 person who prepared the instrument or under whose supervision it 49 was prepared are legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon 50 such instrument; 51 (d)(c)âThe name of each witness to the instrument is 52 legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument 53 immediately beneath the signature of such witness and the post 54 office address of each such person is legibly printed, 55 typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument; 56 (e)(d)âThe name of any notary public or other officer 57 authorized to take acknowledgments or proofs whose signature 58 appears upon the instrument is legibly printed, typewritten, or 59 stamped upon such instrument immediately beneath the signature 60 of such notary public or other officer authorized to take 61 acknowledgment or proofs; 62 (f)(e)âA 3-inch by 3-inch space at the top right-hand 63 corner on the first page and a 1-inch by 3-inch space at the top 64 right-hand corner on each subsequent page are reserved for use 65 by the clerk of the court; and 66 (g)(f)âIn any instrument other than a mortgage conveying or 67 purporting to convey any interest in real property, the name and 68 post-office address of each grantee in such instrument are 69 legibly printed, typewritten, or stamped upon such instrument. 70 71 As used in this subsection, the term âvalid and unredacted 72 identification documentâ means a government-issued photographic 73 identification card that includes the individualâs name, 74 address, photograph, and signature. The term includes, but is 75 not limited to, a driver license, a passport, an identification 76 card issued by a state, a consular identification card, or a 77 permanent resident card. 78 (3)âThe clerk of the circuit court may return an instrument 79 for correction if it does not comply with subsection (1). Such 80 instrument must be returned within 3 business days after 81 receipt. 82 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.